Massachusetts, session 194th, H2682.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 18A of Chapter 126 of the Generals Laws is hereby amended by striking the 
language thereof, and adding the following:- 
Section 18A.An employee in a jail or house of correction of a county who, while in the 
performance of duty, receives bodily injuries resulting from actions of patients or prisoners in 
custody, and who as result of such injury is entitled to benefits under chapter one hundred and 
fifty-two, shall be paid, in addition to the benefits of said chapter one hundred and fifty-two, the 
difference between the weekly cash benefits to which entitled under said chapter one hundred 
and fifty-two and his regular salary, without such absence being charged against available sick 
leave credits, even if such absence may be for less than eight calendar days duration.